Washington statutes.
RCW 43.131.429

Port district noise mitigation grant program—Termination.

The grant program providing assistance to qualifying port districts for expenses related to noise mitigation under RCW 43.330.610 shall be terminated July 1, 2029.

[ 2024 c 194 s 7.]

NOTES:

Legislative findings—Intent—2024 c 194: See note following RCW 53.54.030.